Rhode Island statutes. Title 30 Military Affairs and Defense
Chapter 30.2 Educational Assistance for Combat Veterans

30-30.2-1.
Short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the “education assistance for combat veterans act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 171, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 217, § 1.

30-30.2-2.
Statement of purpose.

It is hereby found and declared as follows:

The fundamental freedoms enjoyed by all citizens of our state and these United States are ensured in no small part through the honorable service of our nation’s military veterans;

The people of the state have a deep debt of gratitude for the sacrifices made by these men and women who, as combat veterans, placed their lives in harm’s way to protect and defend our nation from all foreign enemies and terrorist threats; and

These men and women should be allowed to resume their education, receive academic credit commensurate with their military training and experience, graduate, and ultimately obtain meaningful civilian employment upon their return to Rhode Island without delay.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 171, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 217, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 50.

30-30.2-3.
Academic credit for military training and coursework.

The state board of education shall ensure:

Enrolled students are awarded education credits based upon their military training or service when academically appropriate; and

Establishment of a preferential class registration process for all state institutions, that shall be reviewed and approved by the board of education to allow combat veterans to register first for all classes at any state-run institution of higher education. In developing rules and regulations, the office of the commissioner of higher education, in consultation with the adjutant general of the Rhode Island national guard, shall determine individual preference ranking among combat veterans, including, but not limited to, the number of combat tours served, service awards, and any other such criteria deemed appropriate by the adjutant general.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 171, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 217, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 50.